Hawaii, session 2025, SB790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the department of education accumulates a large amount of food waste and rubbish from two hundred ninety-six schools.  Most of this food waste and rubbish ends up in landfills, significantly impacting the State's environment and finances.  The legislature further finds that the State does not have a state-wide food waste law. Although the city and county of Honolulu enacted its municipal waste ban requiring owners of food establishments to collect and recycle food waste, our landfills are nearing capacity at an alarming rate, requiring immediate action to reduce waste. According to the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), food waste is the single largest component in landfills and makes up about twenty-two per cent of municipal solid waste, contributing substantially to greenhouse gas emissions.  During the public informational meeting on the Waimanalo gulch sanitary landfill in August 2024, the city and county of Honolulu department of environmental services said that the department of education contributes the most food waste to the Waimanalo gulch landfill. Composting food waste with digesters would produce clean, mulch free of coconut rhinoceros beetles for local farmers, addressing the community concern over unclean mulch from commercial sources such as nurseries and big-box stores. Mulch from commercial sources has been linked to spreading invasive species. The legislature believes that integrating food digesters into schools aligns with Hawaiis sustainability goals, sets a powerful example for state-run institutions such as hospitals, prisons, and other public facilities, and demonstrates leadership in waste reduction and environmental stewardship.  The nutrient-rich soil produced from composting school food waste could directly benefit local farms and gardens, fostering a circular economy that supports sustainable agriculture and reduces dependency on imported soil amendments. The legislature also believes that implementing food waste composting in schools would empower Hawaiis youth to be leaders in sustainability, promote hands-on environmental education, and foster a culture of responsibility for the aina (land), while decreasing the amount being taken to the landfill and thereby reducing greenhouse gas emissions. The purpose of this Act is to require the department of education to establish a food waste composting pilot project at the Nanakuli high and intermediate school. SECTION 2. The department of education shall establish a food waste composting pilot project at the Nanakuli high and intermediate school.  For purposes of the pilot project the department of education shall collaborate with environmental organizations, local farmers, and waste management experts to ensure the proper implementation, monitoring, and utilization of the compost produced. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the food waste composting pilot project at Nanakuli high and intermediate school, including for the acquisition and maintenance of food digesters. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________